Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.166

Voter signature verification—Standards.

(1) The secretary of state shall:

(a) Adopt and regularly review statewide standards for determining whether the voter's signature on the ballot declaration is the same as the signature of that voter in the county's registration files as required by RCW 29A.40.110(3);

(b) Adopt, publish, and regularly update a training manual, reviewed by appropriate experts, for the use of local election personnel in implementing the standards adopted under (a) of this subsection; and

(c) Design and implement tools intended to confirm compliance with these standards. These tools shall be available to county auditors for compliance, and may include comparisons, at random intervals, of whether rejections of signatures on ballot declarations for failure to match the voter's signature in the county's registration files comply with the standards adopted under (a) of this subsection.

(2) All training materials for canvassing review board members and election personnel on the statewide standards for signature verification established in this section must be open to the public for observation.

[ 2024 c 269 s 3.]